Maine, session 132, LD801.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3209-A, sub-§8, as amended by PL 2023, c. 230, §1, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
8. Unused kilowatt-hour credits. Unused kilowatt-hour credits accumulated by a
customer participating in a net energy billing arrangement may not expire. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, a transmission and distribution utility may not charge
a customer a fee related to unused kilowatt-hour credits.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3214, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 230, §2, is
further amended to read:
B. Set initial funding for programs based on an assessment of aggregate customer need
in periodic rate cases. The funding formula may not result in assistance being counted
as income or as a resource in other means-tested assistance programs for low-income
households. To the extent possible, assistance must be provided in a manner most
likely to prevent the loss of other federal assistance; and.
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §3214, sub-§2, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 230, §2, is
repealed.